New Jersey, session 221, A4304.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Reading deficiency means scoring below grade level or being determined to be at risk of scoring below grade level on a screening assessment, diagnostic assessment, standardized summative assessment, or progress monitoring. Reading intervention means an evidence-based strategy frequently used to remediate reading deficiencies that includes, but shall not be limited to, individual instruction, tutoring, or mentoring that target specific reading skills and abilities. Science of reading means evidence-based reading instruction practices that address the acquisition of language, phonological and phonemic awareness, phonics and spelling, fluency, vocabulary, oral language, and comprehension that can be differentiated to meet the needs of individual students. 2.  a.  A school district shall annually provide training to any teacher employed in grades kindergarten through 12 who provides reading interventions to students that exhibit a reading deficiency, and any teaching staff member holding an educational services certificate with a reading specialist endorsement. b.  The training shall include, at minimum, information on: (1)   the science of reading; (2)   reading intervention techniques, including scientifically-backed approaches to teaching students to read; and (3)   distinguishing between identification of a student who may be eligible for special education and related services in accordance with the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act," 20 U.S.C. s.1400 et seq. and a student who may exhibit signs of a reading deficiency. 3.  a. The Department of Education, in consultation with Commissioner of Education-approved educator preparation program providers in the State, shall establish and implement a train the trainer program for the creation of literacy coaches in public schools.  The purpose of the program shall be for reading specialists to provide instruction to interested teachers on the science of reading and reading interventions. b.    The department shall issue a literary coach certificate to any teacher who completes the training, provided the teacher submits proof of completion on a form as determined by the department. c.     A literacy coach shall receive a one-time stipend from the department.  The stipend shall be in an amount determined by the department, subject to available funds. 4.  a.  A school district shall provide any teacher employed in grades kindergarten through 12 with ongoing coaching support to aid in the delivery of reading interventions.  The support shall include, at minimum: (1)   on-site teacher training on evidence-based reading instruction and data-based decision making; (2)   example lessons; (3)   classroom observance during the delivery of reading interventions; and (4)   immediate feedback for improving reading instruction, if applicable. b.    A literacy coach who receives a certificate under the program established pursuant to section 3 of this act may conduct the training established pursuant to subsection a. of this section, provided it does not conflict with the other job responsibilities of the teaching staff member.  Within the limit of available funds, the literacy coach shall be eligible for a stipend from the department for any school year in which the literacy coach conducts the training. 5.    The training and coaching established pursuant to this act shall count towards the professional development requirements established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2013, c.105 (C.18A:6-131). 6.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment.